Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-621
Administrative fines; disposition; collection.

(1) All money collected by the department as an administrative fine shall be remitted on a monthly basis to the State Treasurer for credit to the permanent school fund.

(2) Any administrative fine levied under section 9-620 and unpaid shall constitute a debt to the State of Nebraska which may be collected by lien foreclosure or sued for and recovered in any proper form of action in the name of the State of Nebraska in the district court of the county in which the violator resides or owns property.

Laws 1989, LB 767, § 61;

Laws 1993, LB 563, § 6.